District of Columbia statutes.
47-1207

Improvements of streets about the Capitol.

In the improvements of streets about the Capitol, the Secretary of the Interior shall assess and collect the cost of all improvements made in front of all private property in the same proportion as charged by the District authorities for the same purpose.

R.S., D. C., § 152
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1207.
1973 Ed., § 47-1107.